trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/en/hunspell/en_CA.dic
annul/62	1
appal/62	1
apparel/66	1
backpedal/62	1
barrel/66	1
bedevil/62	1
bejewel/62	1
bevel/66	1
bushel/66	1
cancel/182	1
carol/66	1
cavil/66	1
channel/66	1
compel/62	1
control/66	1
corral/66	1
counsel/66	1
cudgel/66	1
decontrol/62	1
devil/62	1
dial/66	1
dishevel/62	1
dispel/62	1
distil/62	1
dowel/66	1
drivel/66	1
duel/66	1
empanel/62	1
enamel/66	1
enrol/62	1
enthral/62	1
equal/279	1
expel/62	1
extol/62	1
flannel/66	1
forgo/304	575
fuel/66	1
fulfil/62	1
funnel/66	1
gal/66	1
gambol/66	1
gel/66	1
go/327	642
gravel/279	1
grovel/336	1
gruel/337	1
impanel/62	1
impel/62	1
imperil/62	1
initial/279	1
instal/62	1
instil/62	1
jewel/66	1
kennel/66	1
label/66	1
level/387	1
libel/66	1
marvel/66	1
mil/66	1
misdo/418	1
mislabel/62	1
model/66	1
outdo/418	1
pal/66	1
panel/66	1
parcel/66	1
patrol/66	1
pencil/66	1
peril/66	1
pol/66	1
pommel/66	1
propel/62	1
pummel/62	1
quarrel/66	1
rappel/66	1
ravel/66	1
rebel/66	1
redial/66	1
redo/418	1
refuel/62	1
relabel/62	1
remodel/62	1
repel/62	1
revel/66	1
rival/66	1
rowel/66	1
say/496	1
shovel/66	1
shrivel/62	1
signal/279	1
snivel/66	1
spiral/279	1
squirrel/66	1
stencil/66	1
subtotal/66	1
swivel/66	1
tassel/553	1
til/560	1
tinsel/66	1
total/279	1
towel/66	1
trammel/66	1
travel/562	1
trial/66	1
trowel/66	1
tunnel/66	1
undergo/304	1688
unravel/62	1
victual/66	1
weasel/66	1
yodel/66	1
